Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0342.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Involuntary statement" means information provided by a law enforcement officer, if compelled under threat of dismissal from employment or any other employment sanction, by the law enforcement agency that employs the law enforcement officer. For purposes of this act, involuntary statement does not mean a law enforcement officer knowingly and intentionally providing false or misleading information concerning a material fact under the circumstances described in this subsection. (b) "Law enforcement agency" means the department of state police, the department of natural resources, or a law enforcement agency of a county, township, city, village, airport authority, community college, or university, that is responsible for the prevention and detection of crime and enforcement of the criminal laws of this state. (c) "Law enforcement officer" means all of the following: (i) A person An individual who is trained and licensed or certified under the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.601 to 28.615. (ii) A local corrections officer as defined in section 2 of the local corrections officers training act, 2003 PA 125, MCL 791.532. (iii) An emergency dispatch worker employed by a law enforcement agency. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.